District of Columbia statutes.
25-123

Farm winery retail license.

(a)

A farm winery retail license shall be issued to a farm winery to authorize the licensee to sell wine:

(1)

From the place described for consumption off-premises and to deliver the same in the sealed bottle or other closed container in which the same was received by the licensee at the licensed establishment; and

(2)

At the licensed establishment for consumption at the licensed establishment.

(b)

A licensee under a farm winery retail license may sell and deliver alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption only during the hours of sale and delivery specified for a class B off-premises retail licensee under § 25-722, and may sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption except as restricted by § 25-724.

(c)

The provisions of §§ 25-725, 25-741(a) and (b), 25-742, and 25-753 shall apply to a farm winery retail license.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 2(f), 55 DCR 6289
For temporary addition of a section designated as § 25-124, concerning wine pub permit requirements and qualifications, see § 2(g) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).